North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 9. District Attorneys and Prosecutorial Districts.

§ 7A-60.
District attorneys and prosecutorial districts.

The State shall be divided into prosecutorial districts, as shown in subsection (a1) of this section. There shall be a district attorney for each prosecutorial district, as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section who shall be a resident of the prosecutorial district for which elected. A vacancy in the office of district attorney shall be filled as provided in Article IV, Sec. 19 of the Constitution.

(a1)

(Effective through December 31, 2026)

The counties of the State are organized into prosecutorial districts, and each district has the counties and the number of full-time assistant district attorneys set forth in the following table:

Click to view

(a1)

(Effective January 1, 2027)

The counties of the State are organized into prosecutorial districts, and each district has the counties and the number of full-time assistant district attorneys set forth in the following table:

Click to view

(a2)

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 18B.9(f), effective June 28, 2017.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each district attorney for a prosecutorial district as defined in subsection (a1) of this section, other than District 19B, who is in office on December 31, 1988, shall continue in office for that prosecutorial district, for a term expiring December 31, 1990. In the general election of 1990, and every four years thereafter, a district attorney shall be elected for a four-year term for each prosecutorial district other than Districts 16A and 19B, and shall take office on the January 1 following such election. The district attorney for Prosecutorial District 19B, who is elected in the general election of 1988 for a four-year term beginning January 1, 1989, shall serve that term for Prosecutorial District 19B. In the general election of 1992, and every four years thereafter, a district attorney shall be elected for a four-year term for Prosecutorial Districts 16A and 19B and shall take office on the January 1 following such election.

The office and term of the district attorney for Prosecutorial District 12 formerly consisting of Cumberland and Hoke Counties are allocated to Prosecutorial District 12 as defined by subsection (a1) of this section. The office and the term of the district attorney for former Prosecutorial District 16 consisting of Robeson and Scotland Counties are allocated to Prosecutorial District 16B as defined by subsection (a1) of this section. The initial district attorney for Prosecutorial District 16A as defined in subsection (a1) of this section shall be elected in the general election of November 1988, from nominations made in accordance with

G.S. 163-114

as if a vacancy had occurred in nomination, and shall serve an initial term expiring December 31, 1992. In all other respects, subsection (b) of this section shall apply to the district attorneys for Prosecutorial Districts 12, 16A, and 16B to the same extent as all other district attorneys.

No. of Full-Time Prosecutorial Asst. District District Counties Attorneys 1 Camden, Chowan, Currituck, 12 Dare, Gates, Pasquotank, Perquimans 2 Beaufort, Hyde, Martin, 8 Tyrrell, Washington 3 Pitt 14 4 Carteret, Craven, Pamlico 14 5 Duplin, Jones, Onslow, 20 Sampson 6 New Hanover, Pender 20 7 Bertie, Halifax, Hertford, 11 Northampton 8 Edgecombe, Nash, Wilson 21 9 Greene, Lenoir, Wayne 16 10 Wake 43 11 Franklin, Granville, Person 17 Vance, Warren 12 Harnett, Lee 12 13 Johnston 13 14 Cumberland 25 15 Bladen, Brunswick, Columbus 15 16 Durham 18 17 Alamance 12 18 Orange, Chatham 10 20 Robeson 13 21 Anson, Richmond, Scotland 11 22 Caswell, Rockingham 9 23 Stokes, Surry 8 24 Guilford 39 25 Cabarrus 10 26 Mecklenburg 58 27 Rowan 9 28 Montgomery, Stanly 6 29 Hoke, Moore 9 30 Union 11 31 Forsyth 27 32 Alexander, Iredell 14 33 Davidson, Davie 13 34 Alleghany, Ashe, Wilkes, 9 Yadkin 35 Avery, Madison, Mitchell, 8 Watauga, Yancey 36 Burke, Caldwell, Catawba 21 37 Randolph 10 38 Gaston 18 39 Cleveland, 13 Lincoln 40 Buncombe 14 41 McDowell, Rutherford 8 42 Henderson, Polk, Transylvania 10 43 Cherokee, Clay, Graham, 14 Haywood, Jackson, Macon, Swain.

No. of Full-Time Prosecutorial Asst. District District Counties Attorneys 1 Camden, Chowan, Currituck, 12 Dare, Gates, Pasquotank, Perquimans 2 Beaufort, Hyde, Martin, 8 Tyrrell, Washington 3 Pitt 14 4 Carteret, Craven, Pamlico 14 5 Duplin, Jones, Onslow, 20 Sampson 6 New Hanover, Pender 20 7 Bertie, Halifax, Hertford, 11 Northampton 8 Edgecombe, Nash, Wilson 21 9 Greene, Lenoir, Wayne 16 10 Wake 43 11 Franklin, Granville, Person 17 Vance, Warren 12 Harnett, Lee 12 13 Johnston 13 14 Cumberland 25 15 Bladen, Brunswick, Columbus 15 16 Durham 18 17 Alamance 12 18 Orange, Chatham 10 20 Robeson 13 21 Anson, Richmond, Scotland 11 22 Caswell, Rockingham 9 23 Stokes, Surry 8 24 Guilford 39 25 Cabarrus 10 26 Mecklenburg 58 27 Rowan 9 28 Montgomery, Stanly 6 29 Hoke, Moore 9 30 Union 11 31 Forsyth 27 32 Alexander, Iredell 14 33 Davidson, Davie 13 34 Alleghany, Ashe, Wilkes, 9 Yadkin 35 Avery, Madison, Mitchell, 8 Watauga, Yancey 36 Burke, Caldwell 10 37 Randolph 10 38 Gaston 18 39 Cleveland, 13 Lincoln 40 Buncombe 14 41 McDowell, Rutherford 8 42 Henderson, Polk, Transylvania 10 43 Cherokee, Clay, Graham, 14 Haywood, Jackson, Macon, Swain. 44 Catawba 10

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1975, c. 956, s. 4; 1977, c. 1130, s. 3; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1238, s. 2; 1981, c. 964, ss. 2, 3; 1987, c. 509, ss. 4, 5; c. 738, s. 127(a); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1056, s. 1; c. 1086, s. 111; 1989, c. 770, ss. 1, 56; c. 795, s. 24(a), (e); 1991, c. 742, s. 13; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 120(a), (b); 1993, c. 321, ss. 200.4(l), 200.7(a), (b); 1995, c. 507, s. 21.7; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 3(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 22(a); 1997-443, s. 18.11(a); 1998-212, s. 16.20(a); 1999-237, s. 17.8(a); 2004-124, s. 14.6(h); 2005-276, s. 14.2(l); 2006-66, ss. 14.3(a), 14.19(a); 2007-323, ss. 14.14(a), (b), 14.25(j); 2008-107, s. 14.6; 2009-451, s. 15.17E(a); 2012-194, s. 1(b); 2013-360, s. 18B.22(k); 2014-100, s. 18B.7(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-57, s. 18B.9(e), (f), (h), (i); 2017-197, s. 5.6(a)-(c); 2018-5, s. 18B.6; 2018-114, s. 24(a), (b); 2018-121, ss. 3(a), 7; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2019-229, s. 1(a)-(c); 2021-91, s. 13(b); 2021-180, s. 16.8(a).

Subsection (a1) Set Out Twice.

The first version of subsection (a1) set out above is effective January 1, 2021, through December 31, 2026. The second version of subsection (a1) set out above is effective January 1, 2027.

Reduction in Minimum Magistrate Positions.

Session Laws
2010-31, s. 15.14, as added by Session Laws
2010-123, s. 6.4, effective July 1, 2010, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to the number of positions in the Judicial Department, during the 2009-2011 biennium, the Administrative Office of the Courts may reduce positions in the Judicial Department to comply with budget reductions taken by action of the General Assembly for that Department. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, to the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly, and to the Revisor of Statutes, on any reductions taken that affect statutory staffing numbers in Chapter 7A of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws
2012-194, s. 1(a), provides: “The intent of this section is to codify the permanent reductions to the minimum number of magistrates in various counties and the number of full-time assistant district attorneys in certain prosecutorial districts that have been made by the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to Section 15.14 of S.L. 2010-31, as added by Section 6.4 of S.L. 2010-123, to the end that the General Statutes reflect the actual authorized numbers of magistrates and assistant district attorneys.”

John Smith, Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, reported to the Revisor of Statutes et al. by memorandum dated June 30, 2011, that the number of full-time Assistant District Attorneys listed in this section has been reduced as shown in the following list (the numbers for prosecutorial districts not included in the list remains as set out in the section above).

No. of Full- Time Asst.
Prosecutorial District
District Attorneys 6B 5
7 18
9 10
10 41
16B 12
19B 9
20A 11
25 18
27A 14
30 10

Click to view

Session Laws
2012-194, s. 1(a), provides: “The intent of this section is to codify the permanent reductions to the minimum number of magistrates in various counties and the number of full-time assistant district attorneys in certain prosecutorial districts that have been made by the Administrative Office of the Courts pursuant to Section 15.14 of S.L. 2010-31, as added by Section 6.4 of S.L. 2010-123, to the end that the General Statutes reflect the actual authorized numbers of magistrates and assistant district attorneys.”
Session Laws
2012-194, s. 1(b), effectuated the changes from Judge Smith’s memo.

Session Laws
1993, c. 321, s. 200.4(
l
), which amended subsection (a1), was effective November 1, 1993, or the date upon which subsections 200.4(

l

) and (m) were approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever was later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated February 14, 1994.

Session Laws 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 589, s. 5, provides that c. 589, s. 3 becomes effective January 4, 1997, or the date upon which that section is approved under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated December 16, 1996.

Session Laws
2005-276, s. 14.2(
l
), which amended subsection (a1), is effective January 1, 2007 or the date on which subsection (

l

) is approved under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later. Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated January 5, 2006.

Session Laws
2009-451, s. 15.17E, which amended subsection (a1) of this section, is effective January 15, 2011, or the date of preclearance under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act, whichever is later, pursuant to Session Laws
2009-451, s. 15.17E(c). Preclearance was received from the U.S. Department of Justice by letter dated February 4, 2010.

Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “ G.S. 163A-987” for “

G.S. 163-114

” in the first sentence.

Session Laws
2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws
2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (c).

§ 7A-61.
Duties of district attorney.

The district attorney shall prepare the trial dockets, prosecute in a timely manner in the name of the State all criminal actions and infractions requiring prosecution in the superior and district courts of the district attorney’s prosecutorial district and advise the officers of justice in the district attorney’s district. The district attorney shall also represent the State in juvenile cases in the superior and district courts in which the juvenile is represented by an attorney. The district attorney shall provide to the Attorney General any case files, records and additional information necessary for the Attorney General to conduct appeals to the Appellate Division for cases from the district attorney’s prosecutorial district. The Attorney General shall not delegate to the district attorney, or any other entity, the duty to represent the State in criminal and juvenile appeals. Each district attorney shall devote his full time to the duties of his office and shall not engage in the private practice of law.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 5; 1971, c. 377, s. 5.1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1985, c. 764, s. 7; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 852, s. 17; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 12; 1999-428, s. 3; 2017-212, s. 5.2(b).

Cross References.

As to interchangeability of terms “solicitor” and “district attorney,” see

G.S. 7A-66.1

.

§ 7A-62.
Acting district attorney.

When a district attorney becomes for any reason unable to perform his duties, the Governor shall appoint an acting district attorney to serve during the period of disability. An acting district attorney has all the power, authority and duties of the regular district attorney. He shall take the oath of office prescribed for the regular district attorney, and shall receive the same compensation as the regular district attorney.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 7A-63.
Assistant district attorneys.

Each district attorney shall be entitled to the number of full-time assistant district attorneys set out in this Subchapter to be appointed by the district attorney, to serve at the district attorney’s pleasure. A vacancy in the office of assistant district attorney shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment. An assistant district attorney shall take the same oath of office as the district attorney, and shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the district attorney. The district attorney shall devote full time to the duties of the office and shall not engage in the private practice of law during his or her term.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 6; 1971, c. 377, s. 6; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 18B.7(b); 2017-57, s. 18B.9(g).

§ 7A-64.
Temporary assistance for district attorneys.

A district attorney may apply to the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to:

Temporarily assign an assistant district attorney from another district, after consultation with the district attorney thereof, to assist in the prosecution of cases in the requesting district;

Authorize the temporary appointment, by the requesting district attorney, of a qualified attorney to assist the requesting district attorney; or

Enter into contracts with local governments for the provision of services by the State pursuant to

G.S. 153A-212.1

or

G.S. 160A-289.1

.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-7, s. 9, effective June 7, 2012.

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may provide this assistance only upon a showing by the requesting district attorney supported by facts that at least one of the following circumstances apply:

Criminal cases have accumulated on the dockets of the superior or district courts of the district beyond the capacity of the district attorney and the district attorney’s full-time assistants to keep the dockets reasonably current.

The overwhelming public interest warrants the use of additional resources for the speedy disposition of cases involving drug offenses, domestic violence, or other offenses involving a threat to public safety.

There is a conflict of interest.

A county within the jurisdiction of the requesting district attorney is subject to a disaster declaration by the Governor pursuant to

G.S. 166A-19.3(3)

.

The length of service and compensation of any temporary appointee or the terms of any contract entered into with local governments shall be fixed by Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts in each case. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement the provisions of this section or to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to provide the administrative costs of establishing or maintaining the positions or services provided for under this section. Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to maintain positions or services initially provided for under this section.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1999-237, s. 17.17(a); 2000-67, s. 15.4(g); 2010-171, s. 2; 2012-7, s. 9; 2017-158, s. 14; 2018-138, s. 2.12(a).

§ 7A-65.
Compensation and allowances of district attorneys and assistant district attorneys.

The annual salary of:

District attorneys shall be as provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.

Full-time assistant district attorneys shall be as provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act.

When traveling on official business, each district attorney and assistant district attorney is entitled to reimbursement for his or her subsistence expenses to the same extent as State employees generally. When traveling on official business outside his or her county of residence, each district attorney and assistant district attorney is entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses to the same extent as State employees generally. For purposes of this subsection, the term “official business” does not include regular, daily commuting between a person’s home and the district attorney’s office. Travel distances, for purposes of reimbursement for mileage, shall be determined according to the travel policy of the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 689, s. 2.

In lieu of merit and other increment raises paid to regular State employees, a district attorney shall receive as longevity pay an amount equal to four and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) of the annual salary set forth in the Current Operations Appropriations Act payable monthly after five years of service, and nine and six-tenths percent (9.6%) after 10 years of service, fourteen and four-tenths percent (14.4%) after 15 years of service, nineteen and two-tenths percent (19.2%) after 20 years of service, and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service. Service shall mean service in the elective position of a district attorney and shall not include service as a deputy or acting district attorney. Service shall also mean service as a justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, clerk of superior court, assistant district attorney, public defender, appellate defender, or assistant public or appellate defender.

In lieu of merit and other increment raises paid to regular State employees, an assistant district attorney shall receive as longevity pay an amount equal to four and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) of the annual salary set forth in the Current Operations Appropriations Act payable monthly after five years of service, nine and six-tenths percent (9.6%) after 10 years of service, fourteen and four-tenths percent (14.4%) after 15 years of service, nineteen and two-tenths percent (19.2%) after 20 years of service, and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service. “Service” means service as an assistant district attorney, district attorney, resource prosecutor, public defender, appellate defender, assistant public or appellate defender, justice or judge of the General Court of Justice, or clerk of superior court. For purposes of this subsection, “resource prosecutor” means a former assistant district attorney who has left the employment of the district attorney’s office to serve in a specific, time-limited position with the Conference of District Attorneys.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1983, c. 761, ss. 246, 248; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 92, 165; c. 1109, s. 13.1; 1985, c. 689, s. 2; c. 698, s. 10(b); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 224; 1987, c. 738, s. 33(a); 1995, c. 507, s. 7.4A; 1999-237, s. 28.19(a); 2000-67, s. 26.3A(a); 2003-284, ss. 30.19A(a), 30.19A(b); 2005-276, s. 29.23A; 2007-323, ss. 28.15A, 28.18A(d); 2009-451, s. 15.17B(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, ss. 28.15A and 28.18A(d), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “as provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act” for “the midpoint amount between the salary of a senior resident superior court judge and the salary of a chief district court judge, as provided by law,” in the middle of subdivision (a)(1); and, in the middle of the first sentence of subsections (c) and (d), deleted “and” preceding “nineteen” and added “and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service” at the end.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 15.17B(b), effective July 1, 2009, in the second paragraph of subsection (a), substituted “his or her subsistence expenses” for “his subsistence and travel expenses” in the first sentence, and added the last three sentences.

§ 7A-66.
Removal of district attorneys.

The following are grounds for suspension of a district attorney or for his removal from office:

Mental or physical incapacity interfering with the performance of his duties which is, or is likely to become, permanent;

Willful misconduct in office;

Willful and persistent failure to perform his duties;

Habitual intemperance;

Conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude;

Conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice which brings the office into disrepute; or

Knowingly authorizing or permitting an assistant district attorney to commit any act constituting grounds for removal, as defined in subdivisions (1) through (6) hereof.

A proceeding to suspend or remove a district attorney is commenced by filing with the clerk of superior court of the county where the district attorney resides a sworn affidavit charging the district attorney with one or more grounds for removal. The clerk shall immediately bring the matter to the attention of the senior regular resident superior court judge for the district or set of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1(a) in which the county is located who shall within 30 days either review and act on the charges or refer them for review and action within 30 days to another superior court judge residing in or regularly holding the courts of that district or set of districts. If the superior court judge upon review finds that the charges if true constitute grounds for suspension, and finds probable cause for believing that the charges are true, he may enter an order suspending the district attorney from performing the duties of his office until a final determination of the charges on the merits. During the suspension the salary of the district attorney continues. If the superior court judge finds that the charges if true do not constitute grounds for suspension or finds that no probable cause exists for believing that the charges are true, he shall dismiss the proceeding.

If a hearing, with or without suspension, is ordered, the district attorney should receive immediate written notice of the proceedings and a true copy of the charges, and the matter shall be set for hearing not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days thereafter. The matter shall be set for hearing before the judge who originally examined the charges or before another regular superior court judge resident in or regularly holding the courts of that district or set of districts. The hearing shall be open to the public. All testimony shall be recorded. At the hearing the superior court judge shall hear evidence and make findings of fact and conclusions of law and if he finds that grounds for removal exist, he shall enter an order permanently removing the district attorney from office, and terminating his salary. If he finds that no grounds exist, he shall terminate the suspension, if any.

The district attorney may appeal from an order of removal to the Court of Appeals on the basis of error of law by the superior court judge. Pending decision of the case on appeal, the district attorney shall not perform any of the duties of his office. If, upon final determination, he is ordered reinstated either by the appellate division or by the superior court upon remand his salary shall be restored from the date of the original order of removal.

History.

1967, c. 1049, s. 1; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 148, s. 1; 1977, c. 21, ss. 1, 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 13.

§ 7A-66.1.
Office of solicitor may be denominated as office of district attorney; “solicitor” and “district attorney” made interchangeable; interchangeable use authorized in proceedings, documents, and quotations.

The constitutional office of solicitor may be denominated as the office of “district attorney” for all purposes, and the terms “solicitor” and “district attorney” shall be identical in meaning and interchangeable in use. All terms derived from or related to the term “solicitor” may embody this denomination.

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 956, s. 5.

The interchangeable use authorized in this section includes use in all forms of oral, written, visual, and other communication including:

Oaths of office;

Other oaths or orations required or permitted in court or official proceedings;

Ballots;

Statutes;

Regulations;

Ordinances;

Judgments and other court orders and records;

Opinions in cases;

Contracts;

Bylaws;

Charters;

Official commissions, orders of appointment, proclamations, executive orders, and other official papers or pronouncements of the Governor or any executive, legislative, or judicial official of the State or any of its subdivisions;

Official and unofficial letterheads;

Campaign advertisements;

Official and unofficial public notices; and

In all other contexts not enumerated.The interchangeability authorized in this section extends to the privilege of substituting terminology in matter quoted in oral, written, and other modes of communication without making indication of such change, except where such change may result in a substantive misunderstanding. Reprints or certifications of the text of the Constitution of North Carolina made by the Secretary of State, however, must retain the original terminology and indicate in brackets beside the original terminology the appropriate alternative words.

History.

1973, c. 47, s. 1; 1975, c. 956, s. 5.

§ 7A-67.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 32.

§ 7A-68.
Administrative assistants.

Each district attorney shall be entitled to one administrative assistant to be appointed by the district attorney and to serve at his pleasure. The assistant need not be an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of North Carolina.

It shall be the duty of the administrative assistant to assist the district attorney in preparing cases for trial and in expediting the criminal court docket, and to assist in such other duties as may be assigned by the district attorney.

When traveling on official business, each administrative assistant is entitled to reimbursement for his subsistence and travel expenses to the same extent as State employees generally.

History.

1973, c. 807.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Oath of Office. —

Administrative and investigatorial assistants to the district attorney appointed pursuant to this section and

G.S. 7A-69

are not required to take an oath of office as public officials, unless the district attorney assigns such duties the performance of which would involve the exercise of sovereign authority of the State. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Herbert F. Pierce, Fifteen-A Prosecutorial District, 50 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 79 (1981).

§ 7A-69.
Investigatorial assistants.

The district attorney in prosecutorial districts 1, 3B, 4, 5, 7, 8, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15A, 15B, 16A, 18, 19B, 20A, 20B, 21, 22A, 22B, 24, 25, 26, 27A, 27B, 28, 29A, 29B, and 30 is entitled to one investigatorial assistant, and the district attorney in prosecutorial district 10 is entitled to two investigatorial assistants, to be appointed by the district attorney and to serve at his pleasure.

It shall be the duty of the investigatorial assistant to investigate cases preparatory to trial and to perform such other Duties as may be assigned by the district attorney. The investigatorial assistant is entitled to reimbursement for his subsistence and travel expenses to the same extent as State employees generally.

History.

1975, c. 956, s. 6; 1977, c. 969, s. 1; 1981, c. 964, s. 2; 1993, c. 321, s. 200.7(e); 1997-443, s. 18.16; 1998-212, s. 16.21; 1999-237, s. 17.9; 2004-124, s. 14.7(a); 2005-276, s. 14.2(p); 2007-323, s. 14.25(n).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 14.25(n), effective January 1, 2009, and applicable to the 2008 election as provided in the terms of this section, substituted “22A, 22B,” for “22,” in the middle of the first paragraph.

§ 7A-69.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 998, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to district attorney legal assistants, see

G.S. 7A-347

.